Utah statutes.
7-9-42.   Record requirements.
(1) A credit union shall maintain all books, records, accounting systems, and
procedures in accordance with rules the commissioner may prescribe or in
accordance with Chapter 1.
(2)  In prescribing these rules, the commissioner shall consider the size of a
credit union and its ability to comply.
(3)  A credit union is not liable for destroying records after the expiration
of the record retention time prescribed by the rules.
(4)  A photostatic or photographic reproduction of any credit union records
shall be admissible as evidence of transactions with the credit union.
